src/scripts/Russian/dict/compile-dict.foma
# Copyright (C) 2012  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

read text exceptions.txt
define Words
define YoWords Words & [?* ё ?*];

define Unstress 
А -> а || _ ,, 
Е -> е || _ ,, 
И -> и || _ ,, 
О -> о || _ ,, 
У -> у || _ ,, 
Ы -> ы || _ ,, 
Э -> э || _ ,, 
Ю -> ю || _ ,, 
Я -> я || _ ; 

define YoToYe 
ё -> е;

define YoDict [YoWords .o. Unstress .o. YoToYe].i;
define Dict [[Words & [?* [А|Е|И|О|У|Ы|Э|Ю|Я] ?*]] .o. Unstress].i | YoDict;

source extra.foma
source corrections.foma

regex Corrections .P. Dict | Extra;
